Arkansas, session 2025, HB1063.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-3-103(4), concerning the definition of
"disability certification" under the Achieving a Better Life Experience
Program Act, is amended to read as follows:
(4) “Disability certification” means, with respect to an
individual, a certification to the satisfaction of the United States
Secretary of the Treasury by the individual or the parent or guardian of the
individual that:
(A) Certifies that:
(i)(a)(1) The individual has a medically
determinable physical or mental impairment that:
(A) Results in marked and severe
*CRH025*
03-10-2025 10:55:48 CRH025

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 HB1063
functional limitations; and
(B) Can be expected to result in
death; or
(2) Has lasted or can be expected to
last for a continuous period of not less than twelve (12) months; or
(b) The individual is blind within the meaning
of § 1614(a)(2) of the Social Security Act; and
(ii) The blindness or disability occurred before the
individual attained twenty-six (26) forty-six (46) years of age; and
(B) Includes a copy of the individual's diagnosis relating
to the individual's relevant impairment or impairments, signed by a physician
meeting the criteria of § 1861(r)(1) of the Social Security Act;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-3-103(5), concerning the definition of
"eligible individual" under the Achieving a Better Life Experience Program
Act, is amended to read as follows:
(5) “Eligible individual” means an individual who for a taxable
year:
(A) Is entitled to benefits based on blindness or
disability under Title II or Title XVI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C.
§ 301 et seq., and the blindness or disability is a preexisting condition
that occurred before the date on which the individual attained twenty-six
(26) forty-six (46) years of age; or
(B) Has a disability certification filed with the United
States Secretary of the Treasury for the taxable year;

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Effective date.
This act is effective on and after January 1, 2026.

/s/J. Mayberry






03-10-2025 10:55:48 CRH025